Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-804
Appropriations; validity; requirements.

An appropriation shall only exist when the following criteria have been met:

(1) There shall be included the phrase there is hereby appropriated;

(2) A specific fund type shall be identified and the fund shall be appropriated;

(3) The amount to be appropriated from such fund shall be identified;

(4) A specific budget program or a specific statement reflecting the purpose for expending such funds shall be identified; and

(5) The time period during which such funds shall be expended shall be identified.

Laws 1979, LB 232, § 1.